Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6208.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 9e. (1) Beginning January 1, 2020, an An individual seeking to become licensed under section 9, 9b, 9c, or 9d shall complete active violence response training that emphasizes coordinated tactical response to rapidly developing incidents in which intentional physical injury or death to a specific population occurs through the use of conventional or unconventional weapons and tactics. (2) The commission shall promulgate rules establishing the minimum standards for the active violence response training required under subsection (1). (3) Beginning January 1, 2020, an An individual who is licensed under section 9, 9b, 9c, or 9d shall complete the active violence response training described under subsection (1). (4) Beginning on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection, an individual may not become licensed under section 9 if the individual was previously employed by any of the following agencies between September 1, 2025 and January 20, 2029: (a) The United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement. (b) The United States Customs and Border Protection. (c) The United States Citizenship and Immigration Services.